Washington statutes.
RCW 36.90.020

Fair commission abolished—Rights, duties, and obligations devolved upon Lewis county commissioners—Property vested in Lewis county.

The southwest Washington fair commission heretofore established and authorized under the provisions of this chapter is abolished and all rights, duties and obligations of such commission is devolved upon the board of county commissioners of Lewis county and title to or all interest in real estate, choses in action and all other assets, including but not limited to assignable contracts, cash, deposits in county funds (including any interest or premiums thereon), equipment, buildings, facilities, and appurtenances thereto held as of the date of passage of this 1973 amendatory act by or for the commission shall, on *the effective date of this 1973 amendatory act vest in Lewis county for fair and county purposes.

[ 2024 c 75 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.90.020. Prior: 1959 c 34 s 1; 1913 c 47 s 3; RRS s 2747; prior: 1909 c 237 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "the effective date of this 1973 amendatory act" [1973 1st ex.s. c 97] was July 16, 1973.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 36.90.010.